finished/mao.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [V] [ACT] [PASS]

LEXICON Root

Verb ;

LEXICON VINFL 
[V][PASS]:ia #; 
[V][ACT]:0 #; 

LEXICON Verb
aha:ahar VINFL;
ahi:ahir VINFL;
aho:aho VINFL;
ahuru:ahuru VINFL;
aitu:aitu VINFL;
akate:akate VINFL;
akiha:akihan VINFL;
akuaku:akuakut VINFL;
amerika:amerikan VINFL;
amu:amu VINFL;
anahera:anaherat VINFL;
ane:ane VINFL;
ania:anian VINFL;
apa:apan VINFL;
āpiti:āpitir VINFL;
apo:apo VINFL;
apuru:apuru VINFL;
āra:āra VINFL;
ārai:ārai VINFL;
ararere:ararere VINFL;
are:are VINFL;
arihi:arihi VINFL;
āro:āron VINFL;
ārohi:ārohin VINFL;
arotake:arotaken VINFL;
arutau:arutauh VINFL;
atawhai:atawhait VINFL;
ātete:ātete VINFL;
au:au VINFL;
aukati:aukatin VINFL;
auraki:aurakin VINFL;
auto:auto VINFL;
āwangawanga:āwangawangat VINFL;
āwhe:āwhe VINFL;
awhiti:awhiti VINFL;
ehe:ehek VINFL;
eka:eka VINFL;
eo:eo VINFL;
eri:erin VINFL;
et:et VINFL;
ha:han VINFL;
haeana:haeanat VINFL;
hāhau:hāhaut VINFL;
haira:hairan VINFL;
hakara:hakara VINFL;
haki:haki VINFL;
haku:haku VINFL;
hame:hamer VINFL;
hamu:hamu VINFL;
hane:hane VINFL;
hangi:hangin VINFL;
hao:haon VINFL;
hapai:hapai VINFL;
hāpi:hāpi VINFL;
hara:hara VINFL;
haratei:haratein VINFL;
hariha:hariha VINFL;
hata:hatan VINFL;
hatini:hatini VINFL;
hauhau:hauhau VINFL;
hauma:hauman VINFL;
hauparo:hauparo VINFL;
hauware:hauware VINFL;
heia:heian VINFL;
hēpia:hēpian VINFL;
heri:herin VINFL;
hi:hih VINFL;
hihiri:hihiri VINFL;
hikoi:hikoi VINFL;
hīpoki:hīpokin VINFL;
hita:hitan VINFL;
hoa:hoa VINFL;
hohou:hohou VINFL;
honga:honga VINFL;
hopu:hopu VINFL;
horohoro:horohorom VINFL;
houhou:houhout VINFL;
huai:huain VINFL;
huiru:huiru VINFL;
hunga:hungar VINFL;
huri:huri VINFL;
huti:hutin VINFL;
ihai:ihai VINFL;
inaru:inaru VINFL;
inonoti:inonotit VINFL;
it:it VINFL;
kā:kāt VINFL;
kahi:kahim VINFL;
kahuti:kahuti VINFL;
kaihoro:kaihorot VINFL;
kain:kain VINFL;
kaiwha:kaiwhan VINFL;
kākari:kākarit VINFL;
kana:kanan VINFL;
kaparu:kaparu VINFL;
kāpūngāwhā:kāpūngāwhā VINFL;
karaka:karakah VINFL;
karata:karatan VINFL;
kare:kare VINFL;
karika:karikat VINFL;
katata:katata VINFL;
kauaro:kauaro VINFL;
kaupēhi:kaupēhi VINFL;
kāwa:kāwan VINFL;
kāwiri:kāwiri VINFL;
kere:kere VINFL;
ki:kik VINFL;
kiki:kiki VINFL;
kipakipa:kipakipa VINFL;
kite:kite VINFL;
koe:koe VINFL;
kōhaki:kōhakin VINFL;
kohiri:kohiri VINFL;
kōhuru:kōhurut VINFL;
koko:kokon VINFL;
kōkuhu:kōkuhut VINFL;
kōmukumuku:kōmukumuku VINFL;
kōnohi:kōnohit VINFL;
kōpē:kōpēt VINFL;
kōpure:kōpure VINFL;
korehu:korehu VINFL;
koro:koro VINFL;
kōrori:kōrorit VINFL;
kotata:kotata VINFL;
kounu:kounuh VINFL;
kowhiri:kowhiri VINFL;
kuhu:kuhu VINFL;
kukuti:kukuti VINFL;
kurupe:kurupen VINFL;
ma:ma VINFL;
mahai:mahai VINFL;
mahiti:mahitit VINFL;
maiai:maiai VINFL;
maka:maka VINFL;
makere:makeret VINFL;
makoako:makoako VINFL;
mamau:mamaur VINFL;
manatu:manatun VINFL;
mangapu:mangapu VINFL;
mano:mano VINFL;
māpu:māpu VINFL;
mare:mare VINFL;
mariu:mariu VINFL;
matā:matā VINFL;
mātaki:mātakit VINFL;
matarekereke:matarekereket VINFL;
matawai:matawai VINFL;
matipu:matipu VINFL;
maukoro:maukoro VINFL;
me:mer VINFL;
meme:memet VINFL;
mete:meter VINFL;
mika:mika VINFL;
miria:mirian VINFL;
moa:moan VINFL;
moī:moīt VINFL;
mōnehu:mōnehut VINFL;
mota:motan VINFL;
motunui:motunui VINFL;
muhu:muhu VINFL;
naero:naero VINFL;
nana:nana VINFL;
nata:natar VINFL;
nehu:nehu VINFL;
ngaha:ngahan VINFL;
ngana:ngana VINFL;
ngatu:ngatun VINFL;
ngote:ngote VINFL;
no:no VINFL;
nuha:nuhan VINFL;
oa:oa VINFL;
ohe:oheh VINFL;
oka:oka VINFL;
okoha:okohan VINFL;
on:on VINFL;
ope:open VINFL;
orehu:orehu VINFL;
otahu:otahun VINFL;
otii:otii VINFL;
oturi:oturi VINFL;
pā:pāh VINFL;
pae:pae VINFL;
pahiatu:pahiatu VINFL;
paihere:paiheret VINFL;
pakare:pakare VINFL;
pako:pakon VINFL;
paneke:paneken VINFL;
papa:papan VINFL;
papare:papare VINFL;
pāpuni:pāpuni VINFL;
paraire:parairet VINFL;
parata:paratan VINFL;
paretau:paretau VINFL;
pata:patan VINFL;
pātari:pātari VINFL;
patoro:patoro VINFL;
paute:paute VINFL;
pehe:pehe VINFL;
pen:pen VINFL;
pere:pereh VINFL;
petani:petani VINFL;
piha:piha VINFL;
piki:pikih VINFL;
pirau:piraut VINFL;
pirito:piriton VINFL;
po:po VINFL;
pōhirihiri:pōhirihirit VINFL;
pokerekahu:pokerekahu VINFL;
pop:pop VINFL;
pōrahu:pōrahu VINFL;
poropiti:poropitir VINFL;
pōti:pōtit VINFL;
poutu:poutu VINFL;
puaka:puakan VINFL;
puhi:puhi VINFL;
puke:puke VINFL;
puku:puku VINFL;
pupuri:pupurit VINFL;
puri:purih VINFL;
puruta:purutan VINFL;
pūtoi:pūtoit VINFL;
raere:raeren VINFL;
rāihe:rāihet VINFL;
rākai:rākai VINFL;
ramaru:ramaru VINFL;
rangirangi:rangirangit VINFL;
rapi:rapi VINFL;
rārangi:rārangit VINFL;
ratara:rataran VINFL;
raupapa:raupapat VINFL;
rawehoi:rawehoit VINFL;
rehi:rehin VINFL;
rene:renet VINFL;
rewe:rewen VINFL;
rihai:rihain VINFL;
rinoringa:rinoringat VINFL;
rit:rit VINFL;
ro:rok VINFL;
rōhi:rōhi VINFL;
rongotaima:rongotaimat VINFL;
rota:rotat VINFL;
ruapu:ruapun VINFL;
ruku:rukut VINFL;
ruta:rutan VINFL;
taa:taan VINFL;
tahatu:tahatun VINFL;
tāhoro:tāhoro VINFL;
taiapa:taiapat VINFL;
tāina:tāinat VINFL;
taitakoto:taitakotot VINFL;
takakino:takakinot VINFL;
takatū:takatūn VINFL;
tākiri:tākirit VINFL;
taku:taku VINFL;
tāmata:tāmatah VINFL;
tana:tanah VINFL;
tanumi:tanumi VINFL;
tapai:tapai VINFL;
tāpi:tāpir VINFL;
tāpoto:tāpotor VINFL;
tarahae:tarahaet VINFL;
tararu:tararu VINFL;
taria:tarian VINFL;
tāta:tātan VINFL;
tātaku:tātakuh VINFL;
tate:tate VINFL;
tauaro:tauaro VINFL;
taumata:taumatar VINFL;
taupoki:taupokih VINFL;
tāuru:tāuruh VINFL;
tautapa:tautapan VINFL;
tautohetohe:tautohetohet VINFL;
tawa:tawan VINFL;
tāwhai:tāwhait VINFL;
te:teh VINFL;
tene:tene VINFL;
terei:terein VINFL;
tiango:tiango VINFL;
tihore:tihore VINFL;
tike:tike VINFL;
tine:tine VINFL;
tīpako:tīpakoh VINFL;
tiri:tirih VINFL;
tirotiro:tirotiroh VINFL;
tītoi:tītoi VINFL;
tō:tō VINFL;
tohuhono:tohuhonot VINFL;
toko:tokon VINFL;
tono:tono VINFL;
tōrino:tōrinot VINFL;
toru:toru VINFL;
toutou:toutout VINFL;
tuaka:tuakan VINFL;
tuatua:tuatuan VINFL;
tūhiti:tūhitit VINFL;
tuka:tukat VINFL;
tukutuku:tukutukut VINFL;
tūnguru:tūngurut VINFL;
tupo:tupon VINFL;
turaki:turakin VINFL;
turuki:turukit VINFL;
tūtika:tūtikat VINFL;
tuware:tuware VINFL;
uaki:uakin VINFL;
umere:umeret VINFL;
uru:urut VINFL;
uta:utak VINFL;
waea:waeat VINFL;
waiata:waiatat VINFL;
waikari:waikarik VINFL;
waingaro:waingarom VINFL;
wairaka:wairaka VINFL;
waitohu:waitohut VINFL;
wakaoati:wakaoatit VINFL;
wara:warak VINFL;
wau:wau VINFL;
wāwau:wāwau VINFL;
wereta:weretan VINFL;
whā:whāh VINFL;
whaine:whainet VINFL;
whakaae:whakaae VINFL;
whakaako:whakaakon VINFL;
whakaataata:whakaataatat VINFL;
whakaea:whakaeat VINFL;
whakahā:whakahār VINFL;
whakahau:whakahaun VINFL;
whakaheke:whakaheke VINFL;
whakahoa:whakahoat VINFL;
whakahōputu:whakahōputu VINFL;
whakahuahua:whakahuahuat VINFL;
whakaingoingo:whakaingoingot VINFL;
whakakaha:whakakahat VINFL;
whakakāpō:whakakāpōt VINFL;
whakakī:whakakī VINFL;
whakakōmau:whakakōmaut VINFL;
whakakōrino:whakakōrinot VINFL;
whakama:whakaman VINFL;
whakamākoha:whakamākohat VINFL;
whakamao:whakamao VINFL;
whakamātautau:whakamātautaur VINFL;
whakamoamoa:whakamoamoat VINFL;
whakamōrahi:whakamōrahit VINFL;
whakamuri:whakamurit VINFL;
whakangao:whakangao VINFL;
whakangoto:whakangoto VINFL;
whakaoho:whakaohor VINFL;
whakaoti:whakaoti VINFL;
whakapako:whakapakot VINFL;
whakapārure:whakapāruret VINFL;
whakapīkau:whakapīkaut VINFL;
whakaporo:whakaporo VINFL;
whakapuni:whakapuni VINFL;
whakaraerae:whakaraeraet VINFL;
whakarārangi:whakarārangih VINFL;
whakarawe:whakarawet VINFL;
whakariaka:whakariakat VINFL;
whakarongo:whakarongon VINFL;
whakaruke:whakaruke VINFL;
whakatahi:whakatahi VINFL;
whakatangatanga:whakatangatangat VINFL;
whakatātare:whakatātaret VINFL;
whakatautika:whakatautikat VINFL;
whakati:whakati VINFL;
whakatina:whakatina VINFL;
whakatohu:whakatohu VINFL;
whakatu:whakatur VINFL;
whakaturi:whakaturi VINFL;
whakaū:whakaūr VINFL;
whakauru:whakauru VINFL;
whakaware:whakaware VINFL;
whakawhana:whakawhana VINFL;
whakawhiti:whakawhiti VINFL;
whānako:whānakoh VINFL;
wharaki:wharaki VINFL;
whārona:whāronat VINFL;
whaupa:whaupat VINFL;
whea:wheah VINFL;
whewhe:whewhe VINFL;
whiriwhiri:whiriwhiri VINFL;
whoro:whoro VINFL;
wit:wit VINFL;
